HunSpellDictionaries/eu.aff
FLAG num
SFX 12    0       dutzarrik      .
SFX 12    0       dutzarrean      .
SFX 12    0       dutzarreko/243      .
SFX 12    0       dutzarreraino      .
SFX 12    0       dutzarrerantz      .
SFX 12    0       dutzarrerat      .
SFX 12    0       dutzarrera      .
SFX 12    0       dutzarretik      .
SFX 12    0       dutzargatik      .
SFX 12    0       dutzartzat      .
SFX 12    0       duk      .
SFX 12    0       dutaraino      .
SFX 12    0       dutarantz      .
SFX 12    0       dutarat      .
SFX 12    0       dutara      .
SFX 12    0       dutatik      .
SFX 12    0       dutan      .
SFX 12    0       dutarik      .
SFX 12    0       duz      .
SFX 12    0       duzko/243      .
SFX 12    0       durekin      .
SFX 12    0       durekiko/243      .
SFX 12    0       duren/238      .
SFX 12    0       durendako/243      .
SFX 12    0       durentzat      .
SFX 12    0       durentzako/243      .
SFX 12    0       durena      .
SFX 12    0       durenak      .
SFX 12    0       durenarekin      .
SFX 12    0       durenarendako/243      .
SFX 12    0       durenarentzat      .
SFX 12    0       durenari      .
SFX 12    0       durenaz      .
SFX 12    0       durenei      .
SFX 12    0       durenek      .
SFX 12    0       durenekin      .
SFX 12    0       durenendako/243      .
SFX 12    0       durenentzat      .
SFX 12    0       durenetaraino      .
SFX 12    0       durenetarantz      .
SFX 12    0       durenetarat      .
SFX 12    0       durenetara      .
SFX 12    0       durenetatik      .
SFX 12    0       durenetan      .
SFX 12    0       durenetarik      .
SFX 12    0       durenez      .
SFX 12    0       durengan      .
SFX 12    0       durengana      .
SFX 12    0       durenganaino      .
SFX 12    0       durenganantz      .
SFX 12    0       durengandik      .
SFX 12    0       durengatik      .
SFX 12    0       durenoi      .
SFX 12    0       durenok      .
SFX 12    0       durenokin      .
SFX 12    0       durenontzat      .
SFX 12    0       durenotaz      .
SFX 12    0       durenoz      .
SFX 12    0       dureni      .
SFX 12    0       durenik      .
SFX 12    0       durenean      .
SFX 12    0       dureneraino      .
SFX 12    0       durenerantz      .
SFX 12    0       durenerat      .
SFX 12    0       durenera      .
SFX 12    0       durenetik      .
SFX 12    0       duregatik      .
SFX 12    0       duri      .
SFX 12    0       durik      .
SFX 12    0       duriko/243      .
SFX 12    0       duan      .
SFX 12    0       duraino      .
SFX 12    0       durantz      .
SFX 12    0       durat      .
SFX 12    0       dura      .
SFX 12    0       dutik      .
SFX 12    0       tzear      .
SFX 12    0       tzeke      .
SFX 12    0       tzenago/243      .
